Utah statutes.
31A-22-609.   Incontestability for accident and health insurance.
(1) (a)  A statement made by an applicant relating to the person's
insurability, except fraudulent misrepresentation, may not be a basis for
avoidance of a policy, coverage, or denial of a claim for loss incurred or
disability commencing after the coverage has been in effect for two years.
(b)  The insurer has the burden of proving fraud by clear and convincing
evidence.
(2)  Except as provided under Section 31A-22-605.1, a claim for loss incurred
or disability commencing after two years from the date of issue of the policy
may not be reduced or denied on the ground that a disease or physical
condition existed prior to the effective date of coverage, unless the
condition was excluded from coverage by name or specific description in a
provision that was in effect on the date of loss.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(a), a specified disease policy may
not include wording that provides a defense based upon a disease or physical
condition that existed prior to the effective date of coverage except as
allowed under Subsection 31A-22-605.1(2).
